Illinois, session 104th, SB3969.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/7)  (from Ch. 144, par. 187)7    Sec. 7. The Board of Trustees of the University of 8Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 9University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 10the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 11Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 12Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 13of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 14Northern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Western 15Illinois University, the Illinois Community College Board and 16the campuses under their governance or supervision shall not 17hereafter undertake the establishment of any new unit of 18instruction, research, or public service without the approval 19of the Board. The term "new unit of instruction, research, or 20public service" includes the establishment of a college, 21school, division, institute, department, or other unit in any 22field of instruction, research, or public service not 23theretofore included in the program of the institution, and   SB3969- 2 -LRB104 20738 LNS 34241 b1includes the establishment of any new branch or campus. The 2term does not include reasonable and moderate extensions of 3existing curricula, research, or public service programs which 4have a direct relationship to existing programs; and the Board 5may, under its rulemaking power, define the character of such 6reasonable and moderate extensions.7    Such governing boards shall submit to the Board all 8proposals for a new unit of instruction, research, or public 9service. The Board may approve or disapprove the proposal in 10whole or in part or approve modifications thereof whenever in 11its judgment such action is consistent with the objectives of 12an existing or proposed statewide strategic plan of higher 13education and must take into account the unique student 14demographics and needs of the particular institution.15    The Board of Higher Education is authorized to review 16periodically all existing programs of instruction, research, 17and public service at the State universities and colleges and 18to advise the appropriate board of control if the contribution 19of each program is not educationally and economically 20justified. The Board shall annually identify and provide to 21each public university certain programs of instruction that 22exhibit indicators of low performance in enrollment, degree 23completion, and relative high expense per degree. Each public 24university shall review this information, together with any 25other relevant information, and report annually to the Board 26using a status rubric provided by the Board, including   SB3969- 3 -LRB104 20738 LNS 34241 b1programs to be closed or consolidated. The Board shall report 2annually on the instructional programs offered at public 3institutions of higher education, showing (i) the number, 4types, and locations of instructional programs, (ii) any new 5programs that were created, (iii) any existing programs that 6have been closed or consolidated as a result of the review and 7report, and (iv) other information relevant to assessing the 8State's portfolio of programs. The report must be submitted to 9the General Assembly and the Governor by March 15, 2026 and 10each March 15 thereafter. The Board shall have the authority 11to define relevant terms and timelines by rule with respect to 12this reporting. 13(Source: P.A. 104-292, eff. 8-15-25.)